Wisconsin, session 2025, SB971.
do enact as follows:SB971,11Section 1. 101.14 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB971,2,22101.14 (5) (a) In this subsection:SB971,2,331. “Automatic fire sprinkler system” has the meaning given in s. 145.01 (2).SB971,2,742. “Specified agricultural warehouse” means a building designed for the 5primary purpose of storing agricultural fertilizers, pesticides, fungicides, 6rodenticides, insecticides, and other crop protection products for distribution to 7agricultural producers.SB971,2,138(b) Notwithstanding subs. (1) (a) and (4) (a) and s. 101.02 (15) (j), the 9department may not require and, notwithstanding s. 101.02 (7) (a) and (7r), no city, 10village, town, or county may require the installation of an automatic fire sprinkler 11system in a specified agricultural warehouse for which construction is initiated 12after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and that is used to 13store any of the following:SB971,2,18141. Liquid bulk fertilizer or liquid bulk pesticide if the department of 15agriculture, trade and consumer protection requires the storage container of the 16liquid bulk fertilizer or liquid bulk pesticide to be located within a secondary 17containment structure that complies with rules promulgated by the department of 18agriculture, trade and consumer protection.SB971,2,19192. Dry bulk fertilizer or dry bulk pesticide.SB971,3,320(c) 1. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse that 1contains an office unless there exists from the office a means of egress in case of fire 2that does not pass through the area where substances described in par. (b) are 3stored.SB971,3,642. Paragraph (b) does not apply to an area within a specified agricultural 5warehouse or to a structure attached to a specified agricultural warehouse that is 6used as an office or store.SB971,3,1273. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse unless 8the owner notifies the chief of the fire department of the city, village, or town in 9which the warehouse is located that water should not be used to suppress any fire 10occurring at the warehouse and of the chemicals stored at the warehouse and 11updates the chief of the fire department of any changes to the chemicals stored at 12the warehouse.SB971,3,15134. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse after a 14change in its use or occupancy results in the specified agricultural warehouse not 15being used to store the substances described in par. (b) 1. or 2.SB971,3,1916(d) This subsection does not prevent the department or a city, village, town, or 17county from requiring any other fire detection, prevention, or suppression 18requirement authorized under this chapter other than an automatic fire sprinkler 19system.SB971,3,2020